ro-RO: Articol air hockey incluse: Tampoane de pâslă; Pucuri; Palete; Altele
pt-BR: Itens de hóquei de ar incluídos: Almofadas de feltro; Discos; Rebatedores; Outros
lt-LT: Pridedami oro ritulio elementai: Veltinio pagalvėlės; Rituliai; Stūmikliai; Kita
bg-BG: Включени са артикули за въздушен хокей: Филцови подложки; Шайби; Буталки; Други
tr: Dahil olan hava hokeyi ürünleri: Keçe pedler; Diskler; İticiler; Diğer
da: Airhockey-udstyr inkluderet: Filtpuder; Pucke; Skydere; Andet
zh-TW: 包含的空氣曲棍球品項: 毛氈墊; 圓盤; 打擊器; 其他
pl: Dołączone elementy do cymbergaja: Podkładki filcowe; Krążki; Odbijaki; Inne
ja: エアホッケーアイテム付属: フェルトパッド; パック; プッシャー; その他
el: Περιλαμβάνεται κομμάτια Air hockey: Τσοχάκια; Δίσκοι; Χτυπητήρια; Άλλο
es: Artículos de hockey de aire incluidos: Almohadillas de fieltro; Discos; Mazos; Otro
en: Air hockey items included: Felt pads; Pucks; Pushers; Other
de: Enthaltene Airhockey-Artikel: Filzgleiter; Pucks; Pusher; Andere
fr: Accessoires de air hockey inclus: Patins en feutre; Palets; Poussoirs; Autre
pt-PT: Itens incluídos no air hockey: Almofadas de feltro; Discos; Empurradores; Outro
vi: Sản phẩm chơi khúc côn cầu trên không bao gồm: Miếng nỉ lót; Đĩa (Pucks); Tay đẩy; Khác
sk-SK: Súčasťou balenia je aj položka na vzdušný hokej: Plstené podložky; Puky; Odrážadlá; Iné
nl: Meegeleverde airhockey-items: Viltjes; Pucks; Pushers; Overig
ko: 포함된 에어하키 구성품: 펠트 패드; 퍽; 푸셔; 기타
hr-HR: Uključene stavke za zračni hokej: Podlošci od filca; Pakovi; Udarači (pushers); Ostalo
ru: Включенные в комплект предметы для аэрохоккея: Войлочные накладки; Шайбы; Биты; Другое
th: อุปกรณ์ที่รวมมาในชุดแอร์ฮอกกี้: แผ่นสักหลาดรอง; พัก; ตัวตี; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 包括空气曲棍球部件: 毛毡垫; 冰球; 推板; 其他
hu: Tartalmazza a léghokielemet: Filcpárnák; Korongok; Ütők; Egyéb
it: Articolo sull'air hockey incluso: Feltrini; Dischi; Manopole; Altro
sl-SI: Vključeni kosi za zračni hokej: Podložke iz filca; Ploščki; Odbijači; Drugo
fi: Mukana tulevat ilmakiekkotuotteet: Huopatassut; Kiekot; Lyöntikahvat; Muu
nb: Airhockeyutstyr inkludert: Filtputer; Pucker; Pushere; Annet
cs: Obsažené položky pro vzdušný hokej: Plstěné podložky; Puky; Odrážeče; Ostatní
sv: Airhockeyartikel ingår: Filtkuddar; Puckar; Puckskjutare; Övrigt